Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.165

Applicability of administrative procedure act to commission action.

Actions taken by or on behalf of the commission shall be pursuant to chapter 34.05 RCW, or rules adopted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW, and the right of judicial review provided by chapter 34.05 RCW shall be applicable to all such actions and rules.

[ 1994 c 58 s 2.]